ext/spell/lv_LV.aff
SFX %   ērt   eramās     [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   erami      [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramie     [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramiem    [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramo      [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramos     [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramu      [ē]rt
SFX %   ērt   eramus     [ē]rt

SFX e Y 25
SFX e   t   is      t
SFX e   t   uša     t
SFX e   t   ušam    t
SFX e   t   ušu     t
SFX e   t   ušā     t
SFX e   t   usi     t
SFX e   t   ušas    t
SFX e   t   ušai    t
SFX e   t   uši     t
SFX e   t   ušiem   t
SFX e   t   ušus    t
SFX e   t   ušos    t
SFX e   t   ušām    t
SFX e   t   ušās    t
SFX e   t   ušais   t
SFX e   t   ušajam  t
SFX e   t   ušo     t
SFX e   t   ušajā   t
SFX e   t   usī     t
SFX e   t   ušajai  t
SFX e   t   ušie    t
SFX e   t   ušajiem t
SFX e   t   ušajos  t
SFX e   t   ušajām  t
SFX e   t   ušajās  t

SFX a Y 177
SFX a   t   is      [^gīklū]t
SFX a   t   uša     [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušam    [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušu     [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušā     [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   usi     [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušas    [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušai    [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   uši     [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušiem   [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušus    [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušos    [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušām    [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušās    [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušais   [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušajam  [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušo     [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušajā   [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   usī     [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušajai  [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušie    [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušajiem [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušajos  [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušajām  [^lūī]t
SFX a   t   ušajās  [^lūī]t
SFX a   kt  cis     [k]t
SFX a   gt  dzis    [g]t
SFX a   ūt   uvis      [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvuša     [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušam    [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušu     [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušā     [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvusi     [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušas    [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušai    [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvuši     [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušiem   [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušus    [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušos    [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušām    [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušās    [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušais   [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušajam  [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušo     [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušajā   [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvusī     [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušajai  [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušie    [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušajiem [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušajos  [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušajām  [ū]t
SFX a   ūt   uvušajās  [ū]t
SFX a   īt   inis      [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inuša     [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušam    [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušu     [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušā     [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inusi     [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušas    [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušai    [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inuši     [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušiem   [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušus    [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušos    [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušām    [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušās    [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušais   [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušajam  [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušo     [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušajā   [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inusī     [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušajai  [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušie    [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušajiem [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušajos  [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušajām  [ī]t
SFX a   īt   inušajās  [ī]t
SFX a   t   is      [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uša     [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušam    [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušu     [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušā     [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   usi     [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušas    [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušai    [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   uši     [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušiem   [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušus    [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušos    [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušām    [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušās    [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušais   [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušajam  [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušo     [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušajā   [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   usī     [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušajai  [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušie    [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušajiem [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušajos  [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušajām  [^eiu]lt
SFX a   t   ušajās  [^eiu]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlis      [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēluša     [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušam    [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušu     [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušā     [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlusi     [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušas    [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušai    [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēluši     [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušiem   [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušus    [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušos    [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušām    [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušās    [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušais   [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušajam  [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušo     [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušajā   [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlusī     [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušajai  [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušie    [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušajiem [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušajos  [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušajām  [e]lt
SFX a   elt   ēlušajās  [e]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlis      [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īluša     [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušam    [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušu     [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušā     [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlusi     [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušas    [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušai    [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īluši     [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušiem   [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušus    [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušos    [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušām    [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušās    [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušais   [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušajam  [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušo     [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušajā   [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlusī     [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušajai  [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušie    [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušajiem [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušajos  [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušajām  [i]lt
SFX a   ilt   īlušajās  [i]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlis      [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūluša     [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušam    [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušu     [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušā     [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlusi     [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušas    [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušai    [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūluši     [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušiem   [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušus    [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušos    [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušām    [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušās    [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušais   [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušajam  [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušo     [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušajā   [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlusī     [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušajai  [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušie    [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušajiem [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušajos  [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušajām  [u]lt
SFX a   ult   ūlušajās  [u]lt

SFX b  Y 25
SFX b   t   jis      t
SFX b   t   juša     t
SFX b   t   jušam    t
SFX b   t   jušu     t
SFX b   t   jušā     t
SFX b   t   jusi     t
SFX b   t   jušas    t
SFX b   t   jušai    t
SFX b   t   juši     t
SFX b   t   jušiem   t
SFX b   t   jušus    t
SFX b   t   jušos    t
SFX b   t   jušām    t
SFX b   t   jušās    t
SFX b   t   jušais   t
SFX b   t   jušajam  t
SFX b   t   jušo     t
SFX b   t   jušajā   t
SFX b   t   jusī     t
SFX b   t   jušajai  t
SFX b   t   jušie    t
SFX b   t   jušajiem t
SFX b   t   jušajos  t
SFX b   t   jušajām  t
SFX b   t   jušajās  t

SFX I Y 23
SFX I  t    ts      t
SFX I  t    ta      t
SFX I  t    tai     t
SFX I  t    tais    t
SFX I  t    tajai   t
SFX I  t    tajam   t
SFX I  t    tajiem  t
SFX I  t    tajos   t
SFX I  t    tajā    t
SFX I  t    tajām   t
SFX I  t    tajās   t
SFX I  t    tam     t
SFX I  t    tas     t
SFX I  t    ti      t
SFX I  t    tie     t
SFX I  t    tiem    t
SFX I  t    to      t
SFX I  t    tos     t
SFX I  t    tus     t
SFX I  t    tā      t
SFX I  t    tām     t
SFX I  t    tās     t
SFX I  t    tu      t

SFX 0 Y 1
SFX 0   0     u     t

SFX J Y 21
SFX J  t   šana   [^sz]t
SFX J  t   šanas  [^sz]t
SFX J  t   šanai  [^sz]t
SFX J  t   šanu   [^sz]t
SFX J  t   šanā   [^sz]t
SFX J  t   šanās  [^sz]t
SFX J  t   šanām  [^sz]t
SFX J  st  šana   [s]t
SFX J  st  šanas  [s]t
SFX J  st  šanai  [s]t
SFX J  st  šanu   [s]t
SFX J  st  šanā   [s]t
SFX J  st  šanās  [s]t
SFX J  st  šanām  [s]t
SFX J  zt  šana   [z]t
SFX J  zt  šanas  [z]t
SFX J  zt  šanai  [z]t
SFX J  zt  šanu   [z]t
SFX J  zt  šanā   [z]t
SFX J  zt  šanās  [z]t
SFX J  zt  šanām  [z]t
