ext/spell/lv_LV.dic
aizkniest/+3IeF4
aizkārpīt/+h(bgMcIB1d[JC
aizlipināt/h(+bJcIdCB[g1M
aizlūst/%+7J0
aizpogot/b)+I$BJH1M
aizpūt/J+0
aizsienams/a+Ooi
aizsniegt/hd(+6aIB%[8JM5
aizsvītrot/+)$HbMIB1J
aiztriept/IB6e)+$J4M
aizvidžināt/+(1IBc[gbhdMCJ
anglisks/oaYi
apaurot/+d)BI1GgHbJ{M
apblenzt/+B4JM0
apcilāt/b+GdM$)1IBgJ[{H
apdvest/+JI3FeM4
apgarot/+dg${JGI1BMbH
apglābt/+B06JM4
apjūgt/+BMJ560
apknābt/+6e$IB)JM
apkrīt/%+0
aplutināt/+h(cbCdBgJIM1[
apmizot/+)bMJHI$B1
appilēt/C+I(bhBJ1M
applet/+J0
applūkt/%Id[+JaB86M5
apreibt/^+eB4IZM7J
apslīpēt/b+)IBJ$MH1
apsēņot/H+)$bJBI1M
apsūt/%+0
aptaukot/dB+IbG1{)g$HJM
aptēst/M3F+Ie}J[4
apvairot/+$dGg{bHB10
apķert/+Ih6BJM([d5
aritmētisks/oaYi
atbizot/M+)I1JBb$H
atbrāzt/ed+6BI[J4}M
atdziest/+%70
atdzirkstēt/hIBJ+bMC1
atgulēt/+bI[dBJhgM1
atklupt/J+Ie4BM
atkļūt/B^+IaZJ74M
atlemt/+JB60M
atpalikt/+[dBIa4JM
atplaukt/J+Za^I74BM
atpīkstināt/g+h(IbBCc1J[dM
atraust/+FheM
atrūkt/Ia+B6%JM5
atspirdzināt/cgh+bICd(B1JM[
attraukt/6a+d%[IJMB5
attēst/M3+0FJ4
atzāģēt/b+IB1$gH)JG{M[d
atģērbt/$+I)dBMJe6[4
atķērkt/%+aIBJ65M
atšaudīt/+h(cIB1bgdMJ[C
auglīgs/a+Yoi
baumot/+IB$)GHgbd1J{M
bezkaunīgs/Y+aoi
burtisks/oiaY
ciet/J+0
degazēt/+bIJ$)HB1M
dehidrēt/[I$g1JdB+{bHGM)
detāls/oYa
dobt/46B+[eI)$JdM
drasēt/+)1IBMbH$J
dīgt/+aMJ^BZI74
garšot/$+bJdGB)gHIM1{
gatavs/oaYi
glaudīt/I+cb(Bg1hM[dJC
gāzelēt/+dBbgHGI{1)[M$J
gāzt/+6[JBdI4eM
iebrēkt/+a%6J[IM5Bd
iedancot/+BH01
iedomīgs/iYao
ieecēt/+b)I$MHBJ1
iejāt/dB+GbI1g$)J6M
iekvēpt/+IJZe^B7M4
ielūgt/+Ia%MJB56
ielūst/%J07+
iemaukt/BI+%5a[6JM
ieplaisāt/bJ+$IB1G{H)[dgM
ierievot/b+)MJBI$H1
iespaidīt/dJ+1BMI(bg
iesvērt/eI%6+[BJM4
iesīkst/%+70
ietērpt/+$I)[edJBM64
iezibsnīt/b+JBdgHGI1)$M
iešņākt/6[+aI%MdJB5
iežmiegt/+aIMd%B5J6[
impresionistisks/oaYi
izburt/+hdM(JB560
izdienēt/+M$Bb)gHGJ[Id{1
izdomāt/+bI)$gHdMJB1[{G
izgrābt/$+e)6BIMJ
izkūst/%07+
izluncināt/+JCch([gdBIb1M
izmaisīt/M+hbdBg(cJ1I[C
izmet/+%0J
izrakt/+daJIB[M
izsmacēt/+IMJ)bB1$H
izsniegt/M+a%I6JB5
izsvilpt/+I$J)d46BeM
iztīt/aBIdJ+M[4
izurgt/I+aBJM
izķeksēt/+b)$HMIJB1
izšņākt/+da%6[IMJB5
jaunraudzīt/+B10
jaunuzņemt/I+
komfortabls/+oiYa
kukuļot/Mgb+{d$IJH1B)G
labpatikt/+B40
labsirdīgs/oaYi
lavēt/BI+Jb{dg[1HG$)M
liekt/+dah}%6IB8J([M5
lipt/M[eBI+dJ4
mandeļveidīgs/oaYi
muižniecisks/oaYi
narkotizēt/$+gHdI)M{JbGB[1
nenest/(Ie8
nogrimt/^+eZIB4J7M
nogrimēt/+1IBJ$bgd[)M{GH
nogulšņāt/BI1+)bG$gdJMH{[
nojaut/+JM0
nokaist/%+Ie7JM
nolakt/+a[JdB4IM
nolupināt/+bhIB(gJc[Md1C
nolūst/%J07+
nonicināt/+hbBIC(M1J
nopampt/I+Z7Be^M4J
noplīst/%e+IF47JM
norēkt/+[Ia6%MdBJ5
nospraudīt/Jh+bIB(1CM
nosērt/+JBM40
nosūkt/+[Ia%dBM5J6
notamborēt/+M$gH)bId{BG[1J
nozvērot/+J)$Ib1BHM
noīrēt/IbHJ+B1M$)
pabeigt/a+%JI[MB65
pablenzt/B+6MIeJ4
padipēt/IB+J(hbCM1
padreifēt/+)BI1Jb$MH
paklupt/+IeB4JM
pakošļāt/+)bGIg{H$Bd1[JM
pakrīt/+%0
pakust/07+
palaidināt/dBMI1gb(+Jhc[C
paprasīt/gb+(CB[Ihcd1JM
paput/+0
pareizticīgs/oaYi
parotēt/+IbJ$)BHM1
paslaukt/+I%aJBM56
paslēpt/d+M$eI6B)J[4
pasprakšķēt/+MbhIBJ(C1
patuvināt/+bBdhI[gM(cC1J
pavākt/I+%M5Bda[6J
pašalkt/+IaB5%MJ6
pašrocīgs/oaYi
pieaust/+EJI2]N
piecept/(+[h8JdIBeM4}
piekarst/I+M%eF47J
piekārt/%Be+M[46J0
pielauzt/IJ+e[M
pielauzīt/b(dBh[+McIJ1gC
piemaskēt/$+b)IB1HJM
pieplūst/+NI%E7J
pieput/0+
piesaitēt/${+dbJ[gIG)MBH1
pietrenkt/a+Bd6IJ%M5
pietēst/I+FeM43J
pievijams/a+oiO
pieķept/4Be+MJ(Ih8
progresīvs/Y+oai
prot/+%0
pumpēt/Bd+Ig[)bGH${1JM
pāraklimatizēt/${b+IB)dHg1MJG[
pārbraukt/%IB+J5aM6
pārgvelzt/+J6eI}B[M4
pārkoklēt/+bJ$1g[IdBGH{)M
pārkrīt/%+0
pārlūst/+J%70
pārmīcīt/dI+BM[cbgJ1C
pārput/+0
pārrāpot/)+BJ$bIHM1
pārslēpt/J+e6IB)$M4
pārsteidzīgs/oaYi
pārsteigt/%MaIB+[J56
pārtrasēt/+I)$JB1bHM
pārķemmēt/1BI+b)$JMH
rosīgs/oaYi
sabeigt/aJ+%dI6BM[5
sabolīt/b+J(gBdIhc[1CM
sabārt/+IeB4Jd[M
sadunēt/I+(bMhCBJ1
sadzīst/+0
sajumt/+)$IMJeB64
sakait/+%0
sakņupt/+eIJ4BM
salūgt/+[%IaMJB56
saprot/%0+
sapēkšķēt/hb+I(BcdMJg1C[
sapļaukāt/+M{$JbB[IGd1Hg)
saskicēt/+MbH)JBI$1
sasmelgt/+JIB5[M6a
sasniegt/+Jh(I%8B6aM5
sasvilpt/+dI$BMe)6J4[
sačirkstēt/h+BIbJM1C
sašmaukt/%Ba+MJI56
sekularizēt/+$I)bJMH1B
sirmot/+JM$Ib)HB1
skaļš/Oo+aYi
stiebrains/oaYi
svelpt/+)$edJ6IB[4M
svīst/I+E%J7N
terasveidīgs/oaYi
trīcināt/+M(bIhcCdJ[gB1
universāls/+oaYi
uzbužināt/I1g[Jh(+BbdCcM
uzcērt/0+
uzinstalēt/+)[$bMGHgBI1{Jd
uzirt/+(eh}[Id6BJM5
uzkrākt/M+Ia%6JB5
uzmet/+%0J
uzplīvot/+)H$BIb1JM
uzsaiņot/BIbH)+$M1J
uzspiegt/%+aMB5IJ6
uzstiept/+[J)dIM$6eB4
uzvēcināt/+Bd(IhcC[J1gMb
uzšļukt/B+40
vaiņagot/M+b$IGg)JHdB1{
vaļīgs/i+oYa
vircot/+)M{GgbJ$dIB1H
zelt/+JIMBa65
ļimt/+^ZB4I7eJM
ļodzīgs/oaYi
